New York, session 2025-2026, A11441.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph d of subdivision 1 of section 13-0339-a of the 2 environmental conservation law, as amended by chapter 340 of the laws of 3 2023, is amended to read as follows: 4 d. Atlantic herring (Clupea harengus) until December thirty-first, two 5 thousand [twenty-six] twenty-nine, 6 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15002-01-6